Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2082.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-121, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-121. Childhood cancer and rare childhood disease research fund A. The childhood cancer and rare childhood disease research fund is established consisting of monies received pursuant to section 28-2442, legislative appropriations, gifts, donations and federal grants. The director shall administer the fund.  Not more than ten per cent percent of monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund.  The first thirty-two thousand dollars $32,000 received pursuant to section 28-2442 shall be reimbursed to the person or entity that paid the implementation fee. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated.  The director shall annually distribute monies in the fund. B. Subject to legislative appropriation or the award of federal grants, or a combination of APPROPRIATIONS and grants, in an amount of at least $5,000,000 for the purposes of childhood cancer and rare childhood disease research, the director shall allocate monies from the fund to health care providers and research institutions that are located in this state, that are nonprofit organizations and that are engaged in phase I clinical trials relating to research on pediatric cancer or other rare pediatric diseases.  The monies may be used in a collaborative study or research program with other facilities outside of this state. Nonprofit organizations receiving monies from the fund shall use the monies for the purposes prescribed in this subsection even if the monies are aggregated with other monies for the grants awarded by the childhood cancer and rare childhood disease research commission established by section 36-121.01. Unless otherwise specified by the federal grant contract, the director may use up to four percent of the amount appropriated or granted to cover administrative costs. C. If the department does not receive additional legislative appropriations or federal grants, or a combination of appropriations and grants, for the purposes of childhood cancer and rare childhood disease research in an amount of at least $5,000,000, the director shall allocate monies received pursuant to section 28-2442 to health care providers and research institutions that are located in this state, that are nonprofit organizations and that are engaged in clinical trials relating to research on pediatric cancer or other rare pediatric diseases. The monies may be used in a collaborative study or research program with other facilities outside of this state. Nonprofit organizations that receive monies from the childhood cancer and rare disease research fund shall use the monies for the purposes prescribed in this subsection even if the monies are aggregated with other monies. C. D. Monies in the fund are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 36, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-121.01, to read: START_STATUTE36-121.01. Childhood cancer and rare childhood disease research commission; membership; reimbursement; conflict of interest; annual report A. Subject to the conditions specified in section 36-121, subsection B, the childhood cancer and rare childhood disease research commission is established consisting of at least the following members who are appointed by the director: 1. One member who is a survivor of childhood cancer or a caregiver to individuals who have childhood cancer. 2. One member who is a survivor of a rare childhood disease or a caregiver to individuals who have rare childhood diseases. 3. Four health professionals who practice in the field of either pediatric cancer or rare childhood diseases. 4. One member who represents a nationwide pediatric cancer advocacy nonprofit organization. B. Commission members shall serve five-year terms and shall annually elect a chairperson from the membership.  Commission members are not eligible to receive compensation but are eligible for reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2. C. The commission shall: 1. Establish criteria for the clinical trials that qualify to receive research grants. 2. Oversee the application process and review applications for the clinical trial research grants to assist the director in selecting the most credible clinical trials to which to award the research grants. 3. Ensure that all commission meetings are open to the public and allow for public testimony. D. The director shall award grants to health care providers and research institutions that are located in this state, that are nonprofit organizations and that are engaged in clinical trials relating to research on pediatric cancer or other rare pediatric diseases.  The monies awarded may be used in a collaborative study or research program with other facilities outside of this state. Nonprofit organizations that receive monies from the childhood cancer and rare disease research fund established by section 36-121 shall use the monies for the purposes prescribed in this subsection even if the monies are aggregated with other monies. D. Commission members shall recuse themselves from discussing and voting on any matter in which they have a conflict of interest. If at any time commission member recusals due to conflicts of interest cause the commission to no longer have a quorum to take official action, the director or the director's designee and other department staff members appointed by the director may act as members of the commission on any grant application at issue. E. Not later than August 1, 2027 and August 1 of each year thereafter, the commission shall submit a report to the appropriations committees and health and human services committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or their successor committees, detailing the number, amounts and recipients of the grants awarded pursuant to this section, the resulting research and any other relevant information. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.